Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2917
Testing, defined.

Testing means standard methods and techniques used to gather data about a patient. Testing includes surface electromyography and, subject to approval of the board, fine wire electromyography. Testing excludes diagnostic needle electromyography.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 135;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,379;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1010.